Idaho, session 2026, H0955.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The Legislature finds that:
(1) The Fifth and Fourteenth Amendments to the Constitution of the
United States prohibit the government from depriving individuals of their
liberty or property interests without due process of law.
(2) The interests and role of parents in the care, custody, and control
of their children are deeply rooted in our nation's history and tradition and
are also among the unalienable rights retained by the people under the Ninth
Amendment to the Constitution of the United States.
(3) Idaho has established procedures for reporting on child abuse and
child neglect under the Child Protective Act, Chapter 16, Title 16, Idaho
Code.
(4) Idaho has established laws for protecting parental rights under
Chapter 10, Title 32, Idaho Code.
(5) The Idaho Legislature wishes to ensure that Idaho's procedures for
child and adult protection cases comport with constitutional due process re-
quirements.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 16, Title 16, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 16-1650, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
16-1650. MEDICAL KIDNAPPING -- PARENTAL RIGHTS. (1) As used in this
section, "medical kidnapping" means the wrongful removal of a minor child
under eighteen (18) years of age or a vulnerable adult from a parent or
guardian by law enforcement, a social worker, or any other official when:
(a) A parent or guardian questions, denies, or declines a potential
medical intervention for the child or vulnerable adult or chooses to
seek a second opinion when there is cause for concern that the potential
medical intervention would do harm to the child or vulnerable adult,
including but not limited to an allergic reaction;


(b) A parent or guardian brings the child or vulnerable adult for medi-
cal intervention at a health care facility and:
(i) A screening establishes that the child or vulnerable adult is
not abused, abandoned, or neglected; and
(ii) The child or vulnerable adult is nevertheless removed from
the parent's or guardian's custody by law enforcement, a social
worker, or another official for invalid reasons, including but not
limited to imminent harm or danger;
(c) A child or vulnerable adult has his or her belongings taken by a
doctor, nurse, staff, volunteer, social worker, or any other official
without parental or guardian consent, including but not limited to a
service or therapy animal, clothes, books, games, cellular phone, wal-
let, eye glasses, water, or food;
(d) A child or vulnerable adult is denied the freedom to continue care
with his or her own medical physicians and specialists as established by
the parent or guardian;
(e) A child abuse specialist visits with a child when it has previously
been verified that no child abuse or neglect has occurred;
(f) A child or vulnerable adult is coerced by medical staff or a volun-
teer into medical intervention;
(g) A doctor, nurse, medical staff, or volunteer takes photos, videos,
lab work, or x-rays or conducts medical testing, care, or treatment
of or on the child or vulnerable adult without consent of a parent or
guardian;
(h) A child or vulnerable adult is forced by medical staff into a medi-
cal intervention without consent of the parent or guardian;
(i) A child or vulnerable adult is unreasonably denied food, water, or
other drinks, including supplemental food or drinks; or
(j) A child or vulnerable adult is ordered to have a medical interven-
tion against parental or guardian consent when it is not required and
may cause a medical condition or harm.
(2) A parent or guardian has the final decision in a child or vulner-
able adult's medical care and treatment. A parent or guardian shall have a
parental and constitutional right to seek medical treatment and make deci-
sions for a child or vulnerable adult when the parent or guardian believes
it is in the best interests of the child or vulnerable adult, including but
not limited to accepting or denying medical intervention, imaging, medica-
tion, or a second opinion. Such choices shall not be deemed child abuse or
neglect and may not be disputed, discriminated against, reported, or inves-
tigated by law enforcement, a social worker, or any other official. A child
or vulnerable adult shall not be removed from a parent or guardian and placed
in state care, a hospital, or any other medical treatment facility by law en-
forcement, a social worker, or any other official unless there is a known in-
stance of abuse or neglect and a criminal complaint has been filed in an in-
vestigation. Treating medical doctors, nurses, specialists, staff, and any
other medical facility employees or volunteers shall abide by a parent's or
guardian's wishes. Any reports made by a reporting person must be substan-
tiated by clear and convincing evidence that a parent or guardian has acted
with negligence or malicious intent to harm the child.


(3) If a child or vulnerable adult has a medical reason, including but
not limited to influenza, gastrointestinal issues, or a compromised immune
system, such reason shall not be excluded as a valid cause or part of a cause
for which a parent or guardian has brought a child or vulnerable adult in for
medical treatment. In such cases, it shall not be assumed that abuse or ne-
glect has occurred, that social services are required, or that an investiga-
tion on the part of child protective services is required.
(4) When a parent or guardian brings a child in for medical care at a
doctor's office, urgent care clinic, hospital, or other medical treatment
facility and after a screening for child abuse or neglect has established
there has not been abuse or neglect, then no further reporting or investi-
gation by a doctor, nurse, staff, volunteer, social worker, law enforcement,
or any other person or official shall be conducted.
(5) When a social worker, psychiatrist, or psychologist visits with a
parent, guardian, child, or vulnerable adult and concludes that no further
investigation is warranted, then no doctor, nurse, staff, social worker,
law enforcement, or any other person or official shall conduct any further
questioning regarding abuse or neglect and may provide only medical care or
treatment.
(6) If a parent or guardian determines that such parent or guardian, the
child, or the vulnerable adult is being mistreated by a doctor, nurse, staff,
or volunteer at a medical facility, there is a right to leave the facility
and seek further medical care at another facility on the person's own accord
and without any involvement by law enforcement, a social worker, or any other
official.
(7) If a doctor, nurse, staff, volunteer, social worker, or any other
person at a medical facility contacts child protective services, adult pro-
tective services, or law enforcement after no initial indication of abuse or
neglect is found, such person may be subject to the provisions of sections
16-1607, 18-5415, and 56-1008, Idaho Code, and the provisions of chapter 45,
title 18, and chapter 10, title 32, Idaho Code, and any resulting child pro-
tection case shall be terminated.
(8) Any person who commits medical kidnapping as described in this sec-
tion shall be subject to:
(a) Loss of licensure as provided in the applicable provisions of title
54, Idaho Code;
(b) The provisions of chapter 45, title 18, Idaho Code;
(c) Registration in the national child abuse and neglect data system
and the Idaho child protection central registry as level one; and
(d) An investigation by child and family services or adult protective
services if the individual has full or partial custody of a child or vul-
nerable adult. The individual shall complete all requirements and rec-
ommendations imposed as a result of such investigation, including but
not limited to:
(i) A full psychological evaluation; and
(ii) Attendance at in-depth courses addressing parenting, nu-
trition, special needs of individuals, and trauma. Such courses
shall not be taught by a social worker, the Idaho department of
health and welfare, or any state employee or state contractor.


(9) When medical kidnapping as defined in this section involves a
child, a parent or guardian may report such child as a missing child as de-
fined in section 18-4508, Idaho Code.
(10) Medical staff, including doctors, nurses, volunteers, or other
officials, shall not use inappropriate language or any discriminatory or
derogatory references to describe a child or vulnerable adult in their care.
A person who uses such language may be subject to a cause of action from a
parent or guardian.
(11) If a child or vulnerable adult is subject to medical kidnapping un-
der this section, the parent or guardian of the child or vulnerable adult
shall have a cause of action against the individuals involved in the medical
kidnapping for restitution and may recover damages and attorney's fees and
any other remedy provided by law.
SECTION 3. That Section 18-4501, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-4501. KIDNAPING KIDNAPPING DEFINED. Every person who wilfully:
(1) A person is guilty of kidnapping if the person willfully:
1. (a) Seizes, confines, inveigles, or kidnaps another, with intent to
cause him or her, without authority of law, to be secretly confined or
imprisoned within this state, or to be sent out of this state, or in any
way held to service or kept or detained against his or her will; or,
2. (b) Leads, takes, entices away, or detains a child under the age
of sixteen (16) years eighteen (18) years of age, with intent to keep
or conceal it the child from its a custodial parent, guardian, or other
person having lawful care or control thereof, or with intent to steal
any article upon on the person of the child; or,
3. (c) Abducts, entices, or by force or fraud unlawfully takes or car-
ries away another at or from a place without the state, or procures, ad-
vises, aids, or abets such an abduction, enticing, taking, or carrying
away, and afterwards sends, brings, has, or keeps such person, or causes
him or her to be kept or secreted within this state; or,
4. (d) Seizes, confines, inveigles, leads, takes, entices away, or
kidnaps another against his will to extort money, property, or any other
thing of value or obtain money, property, or reward or any other thing of
value for the return or disposition of such person is guilty of kidnap-
ing.
(2) "Kidnapping" shall be deemed to include "medical kidnapping" as de-
scribed in section 16-1650, Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 53, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-5313, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-5313. MEDICAL KIDNAPPING. (1) For purposes of this section, "med-
ical kidnapping" means the wrongful removal of a vulnerable adult from a
guardian by law enforcement, a social worker, or another official when:
(a) The guardian questions, denies, or declines a potential medical in-
tervention for the vulnerable adult or chooses to seek a second opinion


when there is cause for concern that the potential medical intervention
would do harm to the vulnerable adult; or
(b) The guardian presents the vulnerable adult for medical interven-
tion at a health care facility and:
(i) A screening establishes that the vulnerable adult is not
abused, neglected, or exploited; and
(ii) The vulnerable adult is nevertheless removed from the
guardian's custody by law enforcement, a social worker, or another
official for invalid reasons, including but not limited to immi-
nent harm or danger.
(2) If a vulnerable adult is subject to medical kidnapping under this
section, the guardian of the vulnerable adult shall have a cause of action
against the individuals involved in the medical kidnapping for restitution
and may recover damages and attorney's fees and any other remedy provided by
law.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.